Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0786.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (b) "Vapor product" means that term as defined in section 4 of the youth tobacco act, 1915 PA 31, MCL 722.644. Sec. 3. (1) A person shall not sell or otherwise transfer a vapor product that has a heating element unless the heating element is made of or encased in 1 or both of the following materials: (a) Glass. (b) Ceramic. (2) Subject to subsection (3), a person that violates subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as follows: (a) For a first violation, imprisonment for not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $200.00, or both. (b) For a second or subsequent violation, imprisonment for not more than 180 days, a fine of $1,000.00, or both. (3) A person that sells or otherwise transfers a vapor product in violation of subsection (1) is not guilty of a misdemeanor under subsection (2) if the person made a reasonable effort to verify that the vapor product met the requirements of subsection (1).